Washington statutes.
RCW 19.95.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Customer" means a residential or commercial property owner or leaseholder who is solicited by or signs a contract with a solar energy salesperson or a solar energy contractor for a residential or commercial solar energy system.

(2) "Dealer fee" means an amount paid by a solar energy contractor or solar energy salesperson to a lender in order to offer a customer credit to finance the purchase and installation of a solar energy system.

(3) "Electric utility" means any entity that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state.

(4) "Major system components" means any inverters, module-level power electronics, solar panels, racking systems, or battery energy storage equipment included in the solar energy installation.

(5) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between the electricity supplied by an electric utility and the excess electricity generated by a customer-generator's net metering system over the applicable billing period.

(6) "Person" includes an individual, corporation, company, partnership, joint venture, or business entity.

(7) "Solar array" means a mechanically and electrically integrated grouping of modules with support structure, including any attached system components such as inverters or DC-to-DC converters and attached associated wiring.

(8) "Solar energy contractor" means a person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that designs, installs, repairs, replaces, or maintains solar energy systems.

(9) "Solar energy installation contract" means an agreement between a solar energy contractor or solar energy salesperson and a customer that includes, in part, an agreement to install a residential or commercial solar energy system for a total cost including labor and materials in excess of $1,000.

(10) "Solar energy salesperson" means a person who solicits, negotiates, or otherwise endeavors to procure a solar energy installation contract with a customer to install, repair, or replace residential or commercial solar energy systems on behalf of a solar energy contractor.

(11) "Solar energy system" is the total components, circuits, solar energy equipment, and other equipment that in combination convert solar energy into electrical energy.

(12) "Solicit" means to make contact with the customer for the purpose of selling or installing residential or commercial solar energy systems including, but not limited to, contact through any of the following methods:

(a) Door-to-door contact;

(b) Telephone contact or text messages;

(c) Flyers left at a residence;

(d) Internet or social media advertisements; or

(e) Other promotional advertisements which offer gifts, cash, or services if the customer contacts the solar energy contractor or solar energy salesperson.

[ 2024 c 349 s 2.]